North Carolina statutes. Chapter 52C. Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.
Article 8. Interstate Rendition.

§ 52C-8-801.
Grounds for rendition.

For purposes of this Article, “governor” includes an individual performing the functions of governor or the executive authority of a state covered by this Chapter.

The Governor of this State may:

Demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in this State with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

On the demand of the governor of another state, surrender an individual found in this State who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee.

A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with this Chapter applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled therefrom.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

This section has not been amended substantively since 1968. Virtually no controversy has been generated regarding this procedure. Arguably application of subsection (c) is problematic in situations in which the obligor neither was present in the demanding state at the time of the commission of the crime nor fled from the demanding state. The possibility that an individual may commit a crime in a state without ever being physically present there has elicited considerable discussion and some case law.
See
L. Brilmayer, An Introduction To Jurisdiction In The American Federal System,” 329-335 (1986) (discussing minimum contacts theory for criminal jurisdiction); Rotenberg,

Extraterritorial Legislative Jurisdiction and the State Criminal Law

, 38 Tex. L. Rev. 763, 784-87 (1960) (due process requires that the behavior of the defendant must be predictably subject to state’s criminal jurisdiction);

cf. Ex parte Boetscher

, 812 S.W.2d 600 (Tex. Crim. App. 1991) (Equal Protection Clause limits disparate treatment of nonresident defendants);

In re King

, 3 Cal.3d 226, 90 Cal. Rptr. 15, 474 P.2d 983 (1970), cert. denied 403 U.S. 931 (enhanced offense for nonresidents impacts constitutional right to travel).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, substituted “of the governor” for “by the governor” in subdivision (b)(2).

§ 52C-8-802.
Conditions of rendition.

Before making demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual charged criminally in this State with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee, the Governor of this State may require a prosecutor of this State to demonstrate that at least 60 days previously the obligee has initiated proceedings for support pursuant to this Chapter or that the proceeding would be of no avail.

If, under this Chapter or a law substantially similar to this Chapter, the governor of another state makes a demand that the Governor of this State surrender an individual charged criminally in that state with having failed to provide for the support of a child or other individual to whom a duty of support is owed, the governor may require a prosecutor to investigate the demand and report whether a proceeding for support has been initiated or would be effective. If it appears that a proceeding would be effective but has not been initiated, the governor may delay honoring the demand for a reasonable time to permit the initiation of a proceeding.

If a proceeding for support has been initiated and the individual whose rendition is demanded prevails, the governor may decline to honor the demand. If the petitioner prevails and the individual whose rendition is demanded is subject to a support order, the governor may decline to honor the demand if the individual is complying with the support order.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

This section has not undergone significant change since 1968. Interstate rendition remains the last resort for support enforcement, in part because a governor may exercise considerable discretion in deciding whether to honor a demand for rendition of an obligor.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, deleted “the Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act, or the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act,” following “Chapter,” in subsection (b).